






    Robert Rosiello | McKinsey & Company | ZoomInfo.com

Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer - MarketWatch




























































Latest News










Dow

21,785
-11.14
-0.05%






Nasdaq

6,354
-28.01
-0.44%






S&P 500

2,466
-9.44
-0.38%









10:37 A.M. ET


                                  Packing the Pounds Back on Pigs
                                





 
10:33 A.M. ET


Updated
      FDA says it plans to lower nicotine in cigarettes to non-addictive levels
                                





 
10:30 A.M. ET


Updated
      Dollar turns lower for the week following GDP report
                                





 
10:29 A.M. ET


Updated
      Set yourself up to get the most out of retirement
                                





 
10:29 A.M. ET


Updated
      Tesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
                                





 
10:29 A.M. ET


                                  Bitcoin prices rise as Ether extends recent weakness
                                





 
10:27 A.M. ET


Updated
      Treasury yields dip after second-quarter GDP data
                                





 
10:26 A.M. ET


Updated
      New rule forces big car makers into big changes in how they count revenues
                                





 
10:25 A.M. ET


Updated
      These are the times you’re actually allowed to put money back into your IRA
                                





 
10:23 A.M. ET


Updated
      Weekend Sip: Is this the world’s first distilled non-alcoholic spirit?
                                





 
10:18 A.M. ET


Updated
      U.S. GDP speeds up to 2.6% in 2nd quarter 
                                





 
10:17 A.M. ET


Updated
      Time for GOP to face reality: Everybody is going to have health insurance
                                





 
10:06 A.M. ET


Updated
      Stock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses 
                                





 
10:06 A.M. ET


Updated
      Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
                                





 
10:04 A.M. ET


                                  Minor lift for final consumer sentiment reading in July as partisan divide remains
                                





 
10:03 A.M. ET


                                  U.S. dollar holds decline after consumer sentiment data
                                





 
10:02 A.M. ET


                                  Treasury yields flat after consumer sentiment data 
                                





 
10:01 A.M. ET
Final UMich consumer sentiment for July was 93.4
 
10:00 A.M. ET


                                  Bojangles' shares sink after revenue miss, guidance cut
                                





 
9:59 A.M. ET


                                  Treasury to wind down the myRA retirement savings program
                                





 








































Log In















 


Until London Markets Close

Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks














Home






CNW Group




Get email alerts



         Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer
    








    By

Published: June 11, 2015 9:00 a.m. ET

Share






















































 



 






















LAVAL, Quebec, Jun 11, 2015 (Canada NewsWire via COMTEX) -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    VRX, -1.63%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                        (VRX) announced today that Robert L. Rosiello was appointed as Executive Vice President and will take over the role of Chief Financial Officer from Howard Schiller on July 1, 2015. Mr. Schiller will remain on Valeant's Board and is expected to serve as a consultant to Valeant.  "The Board of Directors and I are delighted that Rob has agreed to join Valeant," said J. Michael Pearson, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer. "Rob is someone I have worked closely with for 20 years. I know his tremendous expertise in healthcare and in particular M&A, his unquestioned intellect, and work ethic and integrity will prove to be of great value to the Valeant organization and its shareholders. I want to thank Howard for his strong leadership to both myself and the entire organization these past few years and I will continue to rely on his valuable counsel as a member of our Board of Directors."  Mr. Rosiello worked 30 years at McKinsey & Company helping healthcare, technology and consumer companies deliver growth through M&A and business unit financial performance improvement. As Senior Partner in charge of the global merger practice for the past decade, Mr. Rosiello led M&A integrations for pharmaceutical, specialty pharmaceutical and medical device companies in the U.S., Europe and Asia.  Mr. Rosiello serves on the Board of Catholic Charities of New York, the Pew Research Center and the Central Selection Committee of the Morehead Cain Foundation. He received his BA in economics from the University of North Carolina, where he was a Morehead Scholar. He also earned an MS from the London School of Economics and an MBA from Harvard.  About Valeant  Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (nyse/tsx:VRX) is a multinational specialty pharmaceutical company that develops, manufactures and markets a broad range of pharmaceutical products primarily in the areas of dermatology, eye health, neurology and branded generics. More information about Valeant can be found at www.valeant.com.  Forward-looking Statements  This press release may contain forward-looking statements, including, but not limited to, statements regarding the appointment of Valeant's chief financial officer. Forward-looking statements may generally be identified by the use of the words "anticipates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "should," "could," "would," "may," "will," "believes," "estimates," "potential," "target," or "continue" and variations or similar expressions. These statements are based upon the current expectations and beliefs of management of Valeant and are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include the risks and uncertainties discussed in Valeant's most recent annual or quarterly report and detailed from time to time in Valeant's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and the Canadian Securities Administrators, which factors are incorporated herein by reference. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any of these forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date hereof. Valeant undertakes no obligation to update any of these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this press release or to reflect actual outcomes.  Contact Information:  Laurie W. Little 949-461-6002 laurie.little@valeant.com  Media:Renee E. Soto/Meghan Gavigan Sard Verbinnen & Co.212-687-8080rsoto@sardverb.com / mgavigan@sardverb.com   http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnvar/20101025/LA87217LOGO  Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20101025/LA87217LOGO To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/valeant-pharmaceuticals-to-appoint-robert-l-rosiello-as-chief-financial-officer-300097634.html SOURCE Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.  SOURCE: Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.   Copyright (C) 2015 CNW Group. All rights reserved. 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Howard Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise


Tesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?


Hillary Clinton’s new book ‘What Happened’ makes for hilarious R-rated internet

















Quote References


VRX

-0.28
-1.63%





Most Popular





The dark side of cruises





Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.





Dow ends at record, but tech slump weighs on S&P 500, Nasdaq





If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one





How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
U.S.: NYSE: VRX




$16.85

-0.28
(-1.63%)








Volume4.9M
Open$16.80
High$17.16
Low$16.65
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market Cap7.5B
























 























	Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer – Valeant






























    skip to main content
  



INVESTOR RELATIONS HOMEStock Information
Stock ChartHistorical Price LookupInvestment CalculatorAdvanced Fundamentals
Annual Reports ArchiveCorporate Governance
Board of DirectorsCommitteesGovernance DocumentsSEC Filings
Analyst CoverageNews Releases Events and PresentationsInvestor Information
Financial Tear SheetShareholder ServicesDocument RequestsIR and Communications ContactsEmail Alerts









          Menu
        










              Contact Us
            



              Locations
            








                Home
              





                About Valeant
              





                Operational Expertise
              





                Investor Relations
              





                Career Opportunities
              

















        close
      





INVESTOR RELATIONS HOMEStock Information
Stock ChartHistorical Price LookupInvestment CalculatorAdvanced Fundamentals
Annual Reports Archive



Corporate Governance
Board of DirectorsCommitteesGovernance DocumentsSEC Filings
Analyst CoverageNews Releases



 Events and PresentationsInvestor Information
Financial Tear SheetShareholder ServicesDocument RequestsIR and Communications ContactsEmail Alerts










                  Additional Tools
                






                          Email page
                        





                      RSS Feeds
                    



















          Home
          
 
 »
 
          
              
                Investor Relations
              
              »
            
        
          
              
                News Releases
              
              »
            
        
          
              
                2015
              
              »
            
        
                       
              
                Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer
              

Share

facebook
googleplus
twitter
linkedin




   
    
     
        Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer
        
      
    









June 11, 2015





LAVAL, Quebec, June 11, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (NYSE: VRX) (TSX: VRX) announced today that Robert L. Rosiello was appointed as Executive Vice President and will take over the role of Chief Financial Officer from Howard Schiller on July 1, 2015.  Mr. Schiller will remain on Valeant's Board and is expected to serve as a consultant to Valeant.
"The Board of Directors and I are delighted that Rob has agreed to join Valeant," said J. Michael Pearson, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.  "Rob is someone I have worked closely with for 20 years.  I know his tremendous expertise in healthcare and in particular M&A, his unquestioned intellect, and work ethic and integrity will prove to be of great value to the Valeant organization and its shareholders. I want to thank Howard for his strong leadership to both myself and the entire organization these past few years and I will continue to rely on his valuable counsel as a member of our Board of Directors."
Mr. Rosiello worked 30 years at McKinsey & Company helping healthcare, technology and consumer companies deliver growth through M&A and business unit financial performance improvement.  As Senior Partner in charge of the global merger practice for the past decade, Mr. Rosiello led M&A integrations for pharmaceutical, specialty pharmaceutical and medical device companies in the U.S., Europe and Asia.
Mr. Rosiello serves on the Board of Catholic Charities of New York, the Pew Research Center and the Central Selection Committee of the Morehead Cain Foundation.  He received his BA in economics from the University of North Carolina, where he was a Morehead Scholar.  He also earned an MS from the London School of Economics and an MBA from Harvard.
About Valeant
Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (NYSE/TSX:VRX) is a multinational specialty pharmaceutical company that develops, manufactures and markets a broad range of pharmaceutical products primarily in the areas of dermatology, eye health, neurology and branded generics. More information about Valeant can be found at www.valeant.com. 
Forward-looking Statements
This press release may contain forward-looking statements, including, but not limited to, statements regarding the appointment of Valeant's chief financial officer.  Forward-looking statements may generally be identified by the use of the words "anticipates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "should," "could," "would," "may," "will," "believes," "estimates," "potential," "target," or "continue" and variations or similar expressions. These statements are based upon the current expectations and beliefs of management of Valeant and are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include the risks and uncertainties discussed in Valeant's most recent annual or quarterly report and detailed from time to time in Valeant's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and the Canadian Securities Administrators, which factors are incorporated herein by reference. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any of these forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date hereof.  Valeant undertakes no obligation to update any of these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this press release or to reflect actual outcomes. 
Contact Information: 
Laurie W. Little 949-461-6002 laurie.little@valeant.com  
Media:Renee E. Soto/Meghan Gavigan Sard Verbinnen & Co.212-687-8080rsoto@sardverb.com / mgavigan@sardverb.com

Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20101025/LA87217LOGO 
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/valeant-pharmaceuticals-to-appoint-robert-l-rosiello-as-chief-financial-officer-300097634.html
SOURCE  Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.




              << Back to News Releases 
            









            NYSE:VRX
          

            TSX: VRX
          
























          Copyright © 2017 Valeant. All rights reserved.
        



Privacy Policy
Terms & Conditions
Site Map


















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







London Markets Close in:



Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




10:39 AM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:37aPacking the Pounds Back on Pigs
10:34aBREAKINGFDA says it plans to lower nicotine in cigarettes to non-addictive levels
10:30aDollar turns lower for the week following GDP report
10:30aSet yourself up to get the most out of retirement
10:30aTesla earnings: Will Model 3 live up to the hype?
10:29aBitcoin prices rise as Ether extends recent weakness
10:27aTreasury yields dip after second-quarter GDP data
10:26aNew rule forces big car makers into big changes in how they count revenues
10:25aThese are the times you’re actually allowed to put money back into your IRA
10:24aWeekend Sip: Is this the world’s first distilled non-alcoholic spirit?
10:19aU.S. GDP speeds up to 2.6% in 2nd quarter 
10:17aTime for GOP to face reality: Everybody is going to have health insurance
10:06aStock market edges lower, on track for weekly losses 
10:06aHoward Marks says bitcoin isn’t real—and we can all blame millennials for its rise
10:05aMinor lift for final consumer sentiment reading in July as partisan divide remains
10:03aU.S. dollar holds decline after consumer sentiment data
10:03aTreasury yields flat after consumer sentiment data 
10:01aFinal UMich consumer sentiment for July was 93.4
10:00aBojangles' shares sink after revenue miss, guidance cut
10:00aTreasury to wind down the myRA retirement savings program
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,785.19

-11.36
-0.05%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,354.19

-28.00
-0.44%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,466.04

-9.38
-0.38%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































Robert L. Rosiello: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 10:39 AM ET
Healthcare Equipment and Supplies

Company Overview of Synergetics USA, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Robert L. Rosiello  Chief Financial Officer, Executive Vice President and Director, Synergetics USA, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 1 Board Members in 1 different organizations across 2 different industries.See Board Relationships59--
Background

		Mr. Robert L. Rosiello, also known as Rob, has been the Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President at Synergetics USA, Inc. since October 15, 2015. Mr. Rosiello served as an Executive Vice President of Corporate Development and Strategy at Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. from August, 2016 to December 31, 201. He served as the Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President of Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. since July 1, 2015 and ... June 11, 2015 respectively until August, 2016. Mr. Rosiello worked 30 years at McKinsey & Company helping healthcare, technology and consumer companies deliver growth through M&A and business unit financial performance improvement. As Senior Partner in charge of the global merger practice for the past decade, Mr. Rosiello led M&A integrations for pharmaceutical, specialty pharmaceutical and medical device companies in the U.S., Europe and Asia. He has been a Director of Synergetics USA, Inc. since October 15, 2015. Mr. Rosiello serves on the Board of Catholic Charities of New York, the Pew Research Center and the Central Selection Committee of the Morehead Cain Foundation. He received his BA in Economics from the University of North Carolina, where he was a Morehead Scholar. He also earned an MS from the London School of Economics and an MBA from Harvard University.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
3845 Corporate Centre DriveO'Fallon, Missouri 63368United StatesPhone: 636-939-5100Fax: 636-939-6885
Board Members Memberships
2015-PresentChief Financial Officer, Executive Vice President and DirectorSynergetics USA, Inc.
Education
MBA Harvard UniversityMS The London School of Economics and Political ScienceBA University of North Carolina
Other Affiliations
Harvard UniversityValeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.The London School of Economics and Political ScienceUniversity of North Carolina


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Synergetics USA, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



















Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer

















































Data 

Stocks
Events Calendar
Sectors
Investment Strategies
ETFs
CEFs
Mutual Funds
Indices
Economic Indicators
Economic Calendar
News



Tools 

Dashboard
Fundamental Chart
Technical Chart
Equity Screener
Fund Screener
Comp Tables
Timeseries Analysis
Excel
API



Support 

Support Topics
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
About Us
Careers
Financial Glossary


Plans
Free Trial
Sign In

 



Free Trial
Sign In



























Data 

Stocks
Events Calendar
Sectors
Investment Strategies
ETFs
CEFs
Mutual Funds
Indices
Economic Indicators
Economic Calendar
News



Tools 

Dashboard
Fundamental Chart
Technical Chart
Equity Screener
Fund Screener
Comp Tables
Timeseries Analysis
Excel
API



Support 

Support Topics
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
About Us
Careers
Financial Glossary


Plans
Free Trial
Sign In

 



Free Trial
Sign In











Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer

June 11, 2015 09:00

LAVAL, Quebec, June 11, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (NYSE: VRX) (TSX: VRX) announced today that Robert L. Rosiello was appointed as Executive Vice President and will take over the role of Chief Financial Officer from Howard Schiller on July 1, 2015.  Mr. Schiller will remain on Valeant's Board and is expected to serve as a consultant to Valeant."The Board of Directors and I are delighted that Rob has agreed to join Valeant," said J. Michael Pearson, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.  "Rob is someone I have worked closely with for 20 years.  I know his tremendous expertise in healthcare and in particular M&A, his unquestioned intellect, and work ethic and integrity will prove to be of great value to the Valeant organization and its shareholders. I want to thank Howard for his strong leadership to both myself and the entire organization these past few years and I will continue to rely on his valuable counsel as a member of our Board of Directors."Mr. Rosiello worked 30 years at McKinsey & Company helping healthcare, technology and consumer companies deliver growth through M&A and business unit financial performance improvement.  As Senior Partner in charge of the global merger practice for the past decade, Mr. Rosiello led M&A integrations for pharmaceutical, specialty pharmaceutical and medical device companies in the U.S., Europe and Asia.Mr. Rosiello serves on the Board of Catholic Charities of New York, the Pew Research Center and the Central Selection Committee of the Morehead Cain Foundation.  He received his BA in economics from the University of North Carolina, where he was a Morehead Scholar.  He also earned an MS from the London School of Economics and an MBA from Harvard.About ValeantValeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. (NYSE/TSX:VRX) is a multinational specialty pharmaceutical company that develops, manufactures and markets a broad range of pharmaceutical products primarily in the areas of dermatology, eye health, neurology and branded generics. More information about Valeant can be found at www.valeant.com. Forward-looking StatementsThis press release may contain forward-looking statements, including, but not limited to, statements regarding the appointment of Valeant's chief financial officer.  Forward-looking statements may generally be identified by the use of the words "anticipates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "should," "could," "would," "may," "will," "believes," "estimates," "potential," "target," or "continue" and variations or similar expressions. These statements are based upon the current expectations and beliefs of management of Valeant and are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those described in the forward-looking statements. These risks and uncertainties include the risks and uncertainties discussed in Valeant's most recent annual or quarterly report and detailed from time to time in Valeant's other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") and the Canadian Securities Administrators, which factors are incorporated herein by reference. Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on any of these forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date hereof.  Valeant undertakes no obligation to update any of these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date of this press release or to reflect actual outcomes. Contact Information: Laurie W. Little949-461-6002 laurie.little@valeant.com  Media:Renee E. Soto/Meghan Gavigan Sard Verbinnen & Co.212-687-8080rsoto@sardverb.com / mgavigan@sardverb.comLogo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20101025/LA87217LOGO To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/valeant-pharmaceuticals-to-appoint-robert-l-rosiello-as-chief-financial-officer-300097634.htmlSOURCE  Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc. 




Related Stories


New finance chief at Valeant Pharma
SA Breaking News
            06/16 16:21 ET
        

ValueAct Capital Discloses Sale of Shares of Valeant Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.
PR Newswire
            06/11 09:28 ET
        

Valeant Pharmaceuticals To Appoint Robert L. Rosiello As Chief Financial Officer
PR Newswire
            06/11 09:00 ET
        

New indication for Relistor cleared in Europe
SA Breaking News
            06/03 08:43 ET
        

RELISTOR(R) Receives European Approval for Expanded Indication to Treat All Opioid-Induced Constipation
Globe Newswire
            06/03 07:45 ET
        

Bayer may go after animal health businesses once it jettisons plastics unit
SA Breaking News
            05/29 12:19 ET
        

Critical Alerts For Organovo, Avago Technologies, Valeant Pharmaceuticals, AT&T and Boeing Released By InvestorsObserver
PR Newswire
            05/28 09:31 ET
        

Salix Announces FDA Approval of Xifaxan® 550 mg for the Treatment of IBS-D (Irritable Bowel Syndrome with Diarrhea)
PR Newswire
            05/27 17:59 ET
        

FDA clears two new treatments for IBS-D
SA Breaking News
            05/27 17:26 ET
        

PDUFA date tomorrow for Xifaxan expanded use
SA Breaking News
            05/26 10:36 ET
        



Advertisement














{{root.upsell.info.feature_headline}}.

            {{root.upsell.info.feature_description}}
            
Please note that this feature is only available as an add-on to YCharts subscriptions.
            

Please note that this feature requires full activation of your account and is not permitted during the free trial period.
            













            {{root.upsell.info.call_to_action}}
        

            No credit card required.
        


Already a subscriber?
Sign in.
            



























Managing Price, Gaining Profit



























































2/3 Free Articles leftRemaining 



Register for more

 | 


Subscribe + Save!















MENU

 





 













SUGGESTED TOPICS








 

 


Subscribe



  Hi, 




Sign In
Register






Items added to cart

Your Shopping Cart is empty.
Visit our store




 









MY LIBRARY
TOPIC FEEDS
PURCHASES
ACTIVITY
ACCOUNT SETTINGS
EMAIL PREFERENCES
LOG OUT










SUGGESTED TOPICS
































										Loading...
									





Analytics

Managing Price, Gaining Profit


Michael V. MarnRobert L. Rosiello


From the September–October 1992 Issue
					









 SAVE
 SHARE
COMMENT
 TEXT SIZE
 PRINT
 PDF
8.95 BUY COPIES





















View more from the

September–October 1992 Issue






Explore the Archive












										Loading...
									





The fastest and most effective way for a company to realize its maximum profit is to get its pricing right. The right price can boost profit faster than increasing volume will; the wrong price can shrink it just as quickly. Yet many otherwise tough-minded managers shy away from initiatives to improve price for fear that they will alienate or lose customers. The result of not managing price performance, however, is far more damaging. Getting the price right is one of the most fundamental and important management functions; it should be one of a manager’s first responsibilities, a nuts and bolts kind of job that determines the dollar and cents performance of the company.
The leverage and payoff of improved pricing are high. Compare, for example, the profit implications of a 1% increase in volume and a 1% increase in price. For a company with average economics, improving unit volume by 1% yields a 3.3% increase in operating profit, assuming no decrease in price. But, as Exhibit 1 shows, a 1% improvement in price, assuming no loss of volume, increases operating profit by 11.1%. Improvements in price typically have three to four times the effect on profitability as proportionate increases in volume. 



Exhibit 1. Comparison of Profits Levers*  *Based on average economics of 2,463 companies in Compustat aggregate 

With such extreme profit leverage, pricing is one function that a company can always improve. One consumer durable products company increased operating profit dollars by nearly 30% with a mere 2.5% improvement in average prices. An industrial equipment manufacturer boosted operating profits by 35% by carefully managing price levels up a modest 3%. According to our research, a wide variety of businesses, including those in consumer packaged goods, energy, and banking and financial services, have achieved comparable results.
Even if a company’s managers make the right pricing decisions 90% of the time, it’s worthwhile to try for 92%—the payoff is that high. But the price lever is a double-edged sword. The messages of Exhibit 1 also apply in reverse: a mere 1% price decrease for an average company, for instance, would destroy 11.1% of the company’s operating profit dollars.
Pricing issues are seldom simple and isolated; usually they are diverse, intricate, and linked to many aspects of a business. But while most managers have a handle on the bulk of pricing issues, many overlook a key aspect of this most basic management discipline: transaction price management. Without realizing it, many managers are leaving significant amounts of money—potential profit—on the table at the transaction level, the point where the product meets the consumer. Most companies use invoice price as a reporting measure, but the differences between invoice and actual transaction price can mean significant reductions to bottom-line profit.
Some companies that have identified this problem are handling it by applying two basic concepts: the pocket price waterfall and the pocket price band. Reduced to their essentials, these concepts show companies where their products’ prices erode between invoice price and actual transaction price, and they help companies capture untapped opportunities at that level.
The Three Levels of Price Management 
The pricing puzzle is more manageable when taken in pieces. Price management issues, opportunities, and threats fall into three distinct but closely related levels.
1. Industry supply and demand. At this highest level of price management, the basic laws of economics come into play. Changes in supply (plant closings, new competitors), demand (demographic shifts, emerging substitute products), and costs (new technologies) have very real effects on industry price levels. 
  
Managers examining pricing in this context should understand the pricing “tone” of their markets—that is, the overall direction of price pressure (up or down) and the critical marketplace variables fueling that pressure. This knowledge allows managers not only to predict and exploit broad price trends but also to foresee the likely impact of their actions on industry price levels.
2. Product market strategy. The central issue here is how customers perceive the benefits of products and related services across available suppliers. If a product delivers more benefit to customers, then the company can usually charge a higher price versus its competition. The trick is to understand just what factors of the product and service package customers perceive as important, how a company and its competitors stack up against those factors, and how much customers are willing to pay for superiority in those factors.
Market research tools, like conjoint analysis and focus groups, can help managers understand customer perception of benefits. And understanding at this second level of price management helps guide both the product’s price positioning and the fine tuning of product and service offerings.
3. Transactions. At this last level of price management, the critical issue is how to manage the exact price charged for each transaction—that is, what base price to use, and what terms, discounts, allowances, rebates, incentives, and bonuses to apply. Where concern at other price management levels is directed more toward the broad, strategic positioning of products in the marketplace, focus at the transaction level of price management is microscopic—customer by customer, transaction by transaction, deal by deal.







The three discrete levels of price management are clearly related. If, for example, a company foresees an industrywide supply shortage of its product, repositioning the product by lowering the price would be a mistake. In the same way, the product’s market strategy should set the context for transaction-level pricing decisions: a move by Toyota to discount its Lexus luxury sedan at the transaction level would conflict with the market positioning of that model as a high-benefit, fair-priced alternative to competitors like Mercedes Benz, BMW, or Jaguar.
Unfortunately, many top managers perceive transaction pricing decisions as unimportant and often relegate them to low-ranking managers or even entry-level clerks, with some flexibility at the sales force level. By doing so, companies may be foregoing one of the most substantial profit opportunities available.
The Transaction Pricing Opportunity 
The objective of transaction price management is to achieve the best net realized price for each order or transaction. Transaction pricing is a game of inches where tens, hundreds, or even thousands of customer- and order-specific pricing decisions daily comprise success or failure—where companies capture or lose percentage points of margin one transaction at a time. But top management neglect, high transaction volume and complexity, and management reporting shortfalls all contribute to missed transaction pricing opportunities.
The complexity and volume of transactions tend to create a smoke screen that makes it nearly impossible for even the rare senior managers who show an interest to understand what is actually happening at the transaction level. Management information systems most often do not report on transaction price performance, or report only average prices and thus shed no real light on pricing opportunities lost trans action by transaction. 
  
The pocket price waterfall and the pocket price band have proven valuable in lifting this smoke screen and providing a foundation to capture opportunity at the transaction level.
The Pocket Price Waterfall. Many companies fail to manage the full range of components that contribute to the final transaction price. Exhibit 2 shows the price components for a typical sale by a manufacturer of linoleum flooring to a retailer. The starting point is the dealer list price from which an order-size discount (based on the dollar volume of that order) and a “competitive discount” (a discretionary discount negotiated before the order is taken) are subtracted to get to invoice price. For companies that monitor price performance, invoice price is the measure most commonly used. 



Exhibit 2. In the Pocket Price Waterfall, each Element Represents a Revenue Leak 

But in most businesses, particularly those selling through trade intermediaries, invoice price does not reflect the true transaction amount. A host of pricing factors come into play between the set invoice price and the final transaction cost. Among them: prompt payment discounts, volume buying incentives, and cooperative advertising allowances. When you subtract the income lost through these transaction-specific elements from invoice price, what is left is called the pocket price—the revenues that are truly left in a company’s pocket as a result of the transaction. Pocket price, not invoice price, is the right measure of the pricing attractiveness of a transaction.
The manufacturer offered a series of discounts and incentives that affected its product’s pocket price. The company gave dealers a 2% payment terms discount if they paid an invoice within 30 days. It offered an annual volume bonus of up to 5% based on a dealer’s total purchases. Retailers received cooperative advertising allowances of up to 4% if they featured the manufacturer’s products in their advertising. And the company paid freight for transporting goods to the retailer on all orders exceeding a certain dollar value. Taken individually, none of these offerings significantly affected profit. Together, however, they amounted to a 22.7% difference between the invoice and pocket prices.
Otherwise competent senior managers often fail to focus on pocket price because accounting systems do not collect many of the off-invoice discounts on a customer or transaction basis. For example, payment terms discounts get buried in interest expense accounts, cooperative advertising is included in companywide promotions and advertising line items, and customer-specific freight gets lumped in with all the other business transportation expenses. Since these items are collected and accounted for on a companywide basis, it is difficult for most managers to think about them—let alone tally them—on a customer-by-customer or transaction-by-transaction basis.
Exhibit 2, which shows revenues cascading down from list price to invoice price to pocket price, is called the pocket price waterfall. Each element of price structure represents a revenue “leak.” The 22.7% drop from invoice price down to pocket price is not at all uncommon. The average decline from invoice down to pocket price was 16.7% for one consumer packaged goods company, 17.7% for a commodity chemical company, 18.6% for a computer company, 20.3% for a footwear company, 21.9% for an automobile manufacturer, and 28.9% for one lighting products supplier.
Companies that do not actively manage the entire pocket price waterfall, with its multiple and highly variable revenue leaks, miss all kinds of opportunities to enhance price performance.
The Pocket Price Band. At any given point in time, no item sells at exactly the same pocket price to all customers. Rather, items sell over a range of prices. This range, given a set unit volume of a specific product, is called the pocket price band.1,2 Exhibit 3 shows the flooring manufacturer’s pocket price band on a dollars per yard basis for a single product. Note that there is a 35% difference between the highest and lowest priced transactions. Although the width of this pocket price band may appear large, price bands that are much wider are commonplace. Pocket price bands that we examined ranged up to 60% for a lighting fixtures manufacturer, 70% for a computer peripherals supplier, 200% for a specialty chemicals company, and 500% for a fastener supplier. 
  










Exhibit 3. The Elements of a Pocket Price Band Reveal Profit Opportunities 

Understanding the variations in pocket price bands is critical to realizing a company’s best transaction pricing opportunities. If a manager can identify a wide pocket price band and comprehend the underlying causes of the band’s width, then he or she can manipulate that band to the company’s benefit. Recall from Exhibit 1 the huge operating profit payoff from a 1% increase in average price. When, as in the case of the linoleum flooring manufacturer, pocket prices vary over a 35% range, it’s not hard to imagine how more deliberate management of such wide price variations might yield several percentage points of price improvement—and the rich profit rewards that would accompany that improvement.
The width and shape of a pocket price band tell a fruitful story. Managers are invariably surprised not only by the width of their pocket price bands but also by the identity of customers at the extremes of the band. Customers perceived by managers as very profitable often end up at the low end of the band, and those perceived as unprofitable at the high end. The shape of the pocket price band provides the astute manager with a graphic profile of a business—depicting, among other things, what percentage of volume sells at deep discounts, whether there exist groups of customers who are willing to pay higher prices, and how appropriately field discounting authority is being exercised.
The Castle Battery Company Case. The following, somewhat disguised, case shows how one company used the pocket price waterfall and band to identify profit leaks and regain control of its pricing system. It illustrates one way in which the waterfall and band concepts can be applied, and shows how, if a company doesn’t manage its pricing policies on all levels, experienced customers may be working those policies to their own advantage.
The Castle Battery Company is a manufacturer of replacement lead-acid batteries for automobiles. Castle’s direct customers are auto parts distributors, auto parts retailers, and some general mass merchandisers. With return on sales averaging in the 7% range, Castle’s profitability is very sensitive to even small improvements in price: a 1% increase in price with no volume loss, for instance, would increase operating profit dollars by 14%.
Extreme overcapacity in the battery industry and gradual commoditization made it increasingly difficult for Castle to distinguish its products from competitors. So Castle senior management was skeptical that there was much, if any, potential for price improvement. But Castle managers had entirely overlooked lucrative pricing opportunities at the transaction level.
Exhibit 4 shows the typical pocket price waterfall for one of Castle’s common battery models, the Power-Lite, sold to an auto parts retailer. From a base price of $28.40, Castle deducted standard dealer/distributor and order-size discounts. The company also subtracted an on-invoice exception discount, negotiated on a customer-by-customer basis to “meet competition.” With these discounts, the invoice price to the retailer totaled $21.16. What little transaction price monitoring that Castle did focused exclusively on invoice. 



Exhibit 4. Off-Invoice Discounts: a Big Part of the Pricing Picture 

That focus ignored a big part of the pricing picture—off-invoice discounting. Castle allowed cash discounts of 1.2% for timely payments by accounts. Additionally, the company granted extended terms (payment not required until 60 or 90 days after receipt of a shipment) as part of promotional programs or on an exception basis. For this transaction, the extra cost of carrying these extended receivables totaled 22 cents. Cooperative advertising, where Castle contributed to its accounts’ local advertising of Castle products, cost 85 cents. A special merchandising program in effect at the time of this transaction discounted another 60 cents. An annual volume rebate, based on total volume and paid at year end, decreased revenues by yet another 74 cents; and freight paid by Castle for shipping the battery to the retailer cost 32 cents.
The invoice price minus this long list of off-invoice items resulted in a pocket price of only $18.18, a full 14% less than invoice. The total revenue drop from base price down to pocket price is the “pocket discount”—in this case, $10.22, of which $2.98 was off-invoice. 
  
Of course, not all transactions for this particular model of battery had the same pocket price. As Exhibit 5 shows, each element of the pocket price waterfall varied widely by customer and transaction, resulting in a very broad pocket price band. While the average pocket price was $20, units sold for as high as $25 and as low as $14—plus or minus greater than 25% around the average. A price band like this should trigger immediate questions: What are the underlying drivers of the band’s shape and width? Why are pocket prices so variable, and can that variability be positively managed? 



Exhibit 5. A Single Product Can Have a Wide Pocket Price Band 

Castle managers were quite surprised at the width of the price band for their Power-Lite model, but on reflection, concluded that it was due to differences in account sizes. The company had a clear strategy of rewarding account volume with lower price, rationalizing that cost to serve would decrease with account volume.
But when management examined the Power-Lite pocket prices against total account sizes for a sample of 50 accounts, it found no correlation—it was a virtual shotgun blast. A number of relatively small accounts were buying at very low pocket prices while some very large accounts were buying at very high pocket price levels.
Castle managers, perplexed by the scatter of pocket prices by account size, launched an immediate investigation. In most cases, they found no legitimate reason why certain low-volume accounts were paying such discounted prices. Often, they discovered that these accounts were unusually experienced and clever accounts—customers who had been dealing with Castle for 20 years or more and who knew just whom to call at Castle headquarters to get that extra exception discount, that percentage point of additional co-op advertising, that extra 30 or 60 days to pay. These favorite old accounts were granted extra discounts based on familiarity and relationships rather than on economic justification. These experienced clients understood Castle’s pocket price waterfall and were working it against the company.
Castle senior management realized that its transaction pricing process was out of control, that decision making up and down the waterfall lacked discipline, and that no one was focusing on the comprehensive total of those decisions. The end result was a pricing reality that didn’t square with Castle’s strategy of rewarding account size with lower prices, and that was costing Castle millions.
To correct its transaction pricing situation, Castle mounted a three-part program. First, it took very aggressive corrective actions to bring the overdiscounted, “old favorite” accounts back in line. Management identified the problem accounts and explained the situation and its impact on overall company profits to the sales force. Then the company gave the sales force nine months to fix or drop those outliers. Fixing meant decreasing the excessive discounting across the waterfall so that outlier accounts’ pocket prices were more in line with those of accounts of similar size. Salespeople who couldn’t negotiate their outlier pocket prices up to an appropriate level were to find other accounts in their territory to replace them.
Within the time allotted, the sales force fixed 90% of the trouble accounts. Sales’ newfound realization that every element of the waterfall represented a viable negotiating lever contributed to this success. And, in most cases, the salespeople easily found profitable replacements for the other 10%.
Second, Castle launched a program to stimulate volume in larger accounts that had higher than average pocket prices compared with accounts of similar size. Management singled out the attractive “target” accounts for special treatment. Sales and marketing personnel investigated them carefully to determine the nonprice benefits to which each was most sensitive. The company increased volume in these accounts not by lowering price but by delivering the specific benefits that were most important to each: higher service levels for some, shortened order lead times for others, more frequent sales calls for still others. 
  
Finally, Castle embarked on a crash program to get the transaction pricing process back under control. This program included, among other components, setting clear decision rules for each discretionary item in the waterfall. For example, the company capped exception discounts at 5% and granted them only after a specific volume and margin impact evaluation. Management also set up new information systems to guide and monitor transaction pricing decisions. And Castle established pocket price as the universal measure of price performance in all of these systems. It began to track and assign, transaction-by-transaction, all of the significant off-invoice waterfall elements that were previously collected and reported only on a companywide basis. Further, pocket price realization became a major component of the incentive compensation of salespeople, sales managers, and product managers.
Castle reaped rich and sustained rewards from these three transaction pricing initiatives. In the first year, average pocket price levels increased 3% and, even though volume remained flat, operating profits swelled 42%. The company realized additional pocket price gains in each of the two subsequent years.
Castle also received some unexpected strategic benefits from its newfound transaction pricing capability. Account-specific pocket price reporting revealed a small but growing distribution channel where Castle pocket prices were consistently higher than average. Increasing volume and penetration in this emerging channel became one of Castle’s key strategic initiatives this past year. The fresh and more detailed business perspective that Castle senior managers gained from their transaction pricing involvement became the catalyst for an ongoing stream of similar strategic insights.
The Tech-Craft Company Case. Consider another case—one that takes an even finer cut than the Castle example. Here, top management used both the pocket price waterfall and the pocket price band as broader tools. The company not only assimilated valuable information about its pricing policies but also used that knowledge to manipulate its pricing system and influence its retailers. The Tech-Craft Company took the waterfall and band and extended the concept, successfully applying the lessons of a financial tool to benefit its marketing strategy.
Tech-Craft is a manufacturer of home appliances, with microwave ovens as its primary line. Tech-Craft sells its microwave ovens directly to appliance retailers and a variety of mass merchandisers and department stores. With dozens of major and minor brands available, the microwave market is highly competitive and most retail outlets carry multiple brands.
Very complex price structures had evolved over the years in this competitive market. Exhibit 6 shows the average pocket price waterfall (on a percentage of dealer list price basis) for a Tech-Craft transaction to an appliance retailer. The company gave a total pocket discount of 39.1% over 11 different waterfall elements. 



Exhibit 6. Tech-Craft Gave a Pocket Discount of 39.1% After Waterfall Elements 

Research into competitors’ pricing practices revealed that most competitors’ price structures were just as complex as Tech-Craft’s but varied in form—particularly off the invoice. For example, they varied by cash discount terms, co-op advertising rates, volume bonus discounts, volume break points, and freight payment policies. The variety and complexity of price structures made it somewhat difficult for appliance retailers to compare microwave prices among competitors. Further research showed that most retailers used just invoice price minus cash discount as their yardstick for comparing prices, taking for granted most of the off-invoice items. So a dollar discount on the invoice had much more impact on the retailer’s buying decision than a dollar off the invoice.
With this knowledge, Tech-Craft managers made a simple price structure change to one product line. They took their largest off-invoice discount—the annual volume bonus—and shifted it to on-invoice. To do this, they estimated each account’s annual purchases at the beginning of the year, paid the volume bonus on the invoice based on that estimate, and then made an end-of-the-year adjustment if necessary. The result was an 11% increase in same-store volume, not by deeper discounting but rather by tailoring the pocket price waterfall so that Tech-Craft’s price reflected the criterion that retailers used in comparing prices. 
  
The result so intrigued Tech-Craft managers that they researched their pocket price waterfall even further, discovering evidence that retailers were not equally sensitive to price changes across all elements of the waterfall. For example, they found that retailers were much more sensitive to a $1 change in the national promotion discount than to a $1 change in the order-size discount, despite the fact that they affected Tech-Craft’s pocket price equally. Tech-Craft managers used such insights regarding dealers’ unequal sensitivity to different pieces of the waterfall to alter their pricing approach in several areas.
First, when they wanted to lower price to stimulate volume, Tech-Craft managers adjusted the waterfall elements to which their retailers were most sensitive—thus engendering the maximum volume growth. Conversely, when they wanted to raise price to increase margins, they adjusted the elements to which their retailers were least sensitive—thus minimizing loss of volume.
Second, over time they decreased the amount of discounting in the waterfall elements that just didn’t matter to retailers, shifting part of that discounting to those elements that really influenced retailer buying decisions. By doing so, Tech-Craft made sure it was getting the most retailer buying preference for its discount dollars.
Tech-Craft management became quite skillful in the fine art of “waterfall engineering”—that is, fine-tuning the components of its pocket price waterfall to optimize the effect on buyer behavior. Not unlike Castle, Tech-Craft reaped rich rewards from its new-found skills and initiatives in transaction pricing. Within a year, the company had not only grown its unit volume by over 11% but also had increased average pocket price levels by 3.5%, resulting in a 60% operating profit improvement.
Capturing Untapped Transaction Pricing Opportunity 
While the specific moves required to capture untapped transaction pricing opportunity can vary widely from company to company, the most useful improvement actions fall into three general areas.
1. Manage the pocket price band. An understanding of pocket price and its variability across customers and transactions provides the bedrock of successful transaction price management. The entire pricing process should be managed toward pocket price realization rather than invoice price or list price. Pocket price should be the sole yardstick for determining the pricing attractiveness of products, customers, and individual deals. All price measurement and performance gauges should be recast with pocket price used as the base for calculating revenues. As the Castle Battery Company case demonstrates, considering business from this pocket price viewpoint can drastically change a company’s perspective on the relative attractiveness of segments, customers, and transactions.
Creating information systems that correctly measure and report pocket price is problematic for many companies. Elements of the waterfall often reside on different systems or do not exist in data systems at all. These difficulties notwithstanding, companies should make the investment to produce a correct and comprehensive pocket price calculation. Managers must resist the temptation to leave elements out of the waterfall because they are difficult to calculate or inconvenient to include from an information systems standpoint. Effective transaction price management often requires tough customer initiatives, but incorrect or incomplete pocket price reporting gives managers an excuse not to initiate necessary pricing policies.
Once a company establishes a pocket price measure, it should drive explicit sales and marketing steps off the “tails” of the pocket price band. Excellent transaction pricers look to the pocket price band and target specific actions for the best and worst 10% to 20% of transactions and customers. Marketing and sales should target customers with transactions at the high end of the price band for increased volume. These departments should also identify clients at the low price end, marking them for actions that will either result in improved price levels or their termination as customers. 
  
Management should not exclude any low-price customers, regardless of their history or relationship with the company, from such corrective actions. The hard pocket price numbers must determine which customers require remedial price action. Price band management initiatives quickly lose credibility and momentum if exceptions are made that allow favored customers to languish at the low end of a pocket price band.
2. Engineer the pocket price waterfall. The best transaction pricers understand the leverage of waterfall engineering. Despite the fact that a dollar anywhere along the waterfall affects a company’s pocket price and profit equally, the Tech-Craft case demonstrates that not all waterfall elements equally influence customer buying. A knowledge of which pieces of the waterfall matter to customers can guide not only how a company changes overall price and price structure but also how it negotiates with individual customers. Managers shouldn’t be at all surprised if different sets of waterfall elements are important to different customer segments or different channels of distribution. Sales representative input can further enrich understanding of specific customer sensitivity to waterfall elements.
Each component of a company’s pocket price waterfall deserves careful and explicit management. Top managers should set a quantifiable objective for each element of the pocket price waterfall, and if that goal is not achieved, they must change or even discontinue that element. Too many companies put in place a waterfall element like annual volume bonuses and leave it there unchanged, regardless of its effectiveness in influencing customer behavior. The sales and marketing organization should set hard objectives for each waterfall element. For example, the objective for an annual volume bonus might be to cause sales volume to grow at an average of 8% annually in existing accounts.
A company should take an annual snapshot of the results of its efforts. If it fails to meet its objective for a waterfall element, it should either adjust or eliminate that element. Excellent transaction pricing companies, like Tech-Craft, routinely reengineer their pocket price waterfalls and make each piece of the waterfall work for them.
3. Get organizational involvement and incentives right. With percentage points of return on sales in the balance, transaction pricing merits broad organizational involvement; it is too important for even the president and CEO of a business to ignore. Companies that are best at transaction price management have general managers who understand its importance, set specific goals for transaction price improvement, and monitor those goals through regular and concise transaction price performance reports.
Exhibit 7 shows a quarterly “Pocket Price Source of Change” report that the president of Castle now uses to monitor the waterfall for major product lines. From it he can quickly see changes in average pocket price and understand the key sources of those changes along the price waterfall. He can recognize and reward pocket price improvement, question price performance shortfalls, and communicate to his organization that transaction pricing is important to him. 



Exhibit 7. A Quarterly Report Monitors the Waterfall for Major Product Lines 

Deeper in the organization, superior transaction price performance seldom occurs unless top management offers appropriate incentives to key pricing influencers and decision makers like pricing managers, salespeople, sales managers, and marketing managers. Individuals incur an unavoidable risk when they strive for higher prices from customers—the risk of alienating the customer or losing the business altogether. It’s always easier and less risky to price low. To offset the risk of pushing for higher price, tie incentives like compensation to pocket price realization.
Sales force incentives based on total sales revenue are not enough of an inducement for salespeople to push for higher prices. The pricing leverage for sales revenue-based compensation is always out of balance—a 5% decrease in price, for instance, will cause only a 5% decrease in a salesperson’s compensation. But assuming average company economics, it will engender a 60% operating profit decrease for that transaction. Only sales incentive plans that abundantly reward above-average price realization and deeply penalize below average price levels will draw smart and profitable transaction price management from a sales force. 
  
Even if salespeople have no explicit pricing authority, some sales force incentive for transaction price realization may still be prudent. Salespeople are usually the frontline negotiators and the carriers of a company’s benefit and value message. They know the discounting limits their company will approve and will drop to those limits unless adequately compensated to do otherwise. The sales force role in transaction price management is simply too important for much progress to be made without their committed buy-in and support. In both the Castle and Tech-Craft cases, pocket price-based incentives for all pricing decision makers, including the sales force, fueled ongoing improvement in transaction pricing performance.
The transaction pricing opportunity is real and achievable for most companies today. The investment and risk of capturing this opportunity are low; the keys to success are mostly executional—doing a number of small things right. What is more, advances in information technology tend to make many of these small things easier than ever to do. And, as the Castle and Tech-Craft cases show, the payoff is extremely high, both in near-term and sustainable profit improvement and in valuable strategic insights. With its extremely favorable risk-effort-reward profile, improving transaction price management may be one of the most attractive and overlooked profit enhancement opportunities available to most managers.
1. Arleigh W. Walker, “How to Price Industrial Products,” HBR September–October 1967, p. 125.
2. Elliot B. Ross, “Making Money with Proactive Pricing,” HBR November–December 1984, p. 145.

A version of this article appeared in the September–October 1992 issue of Harvard Business Review.








 Michael V. Marn is pricing consultant in the Cleveland, Ohio office of McKinsey & Company, Inc. 



 Robert L. Rosiello is principal in McKinsey Company’s New York City office. 








This article is about ANALYTICS




 Follow this topic



 Following





Related Topics:

Sales
Pricing














						Loading...
					












				Loading...
			























Partner Center
































  




















Institut des sciences et technologies de Paris (Paris Tech) - Course Hero












































Find Study Resources

 Main Menu
by School

by Subject

by Book

Literature Study Guides
Infographics



Get Instant Tutoring Help

 Main Menu
Ask a Tutor a Question


Use Flashcards

 Main Menu
View Flashcards

Create Flashcards


Earn by Contributing

 Main Menu
Earn Free Access

Upload Documents

Write Course Advice

Refer Your Friends

Earn Money

Upload Documents

Create Q&A Pairs

Become a Tutor

Apply for Scholarship














Find
                        Study Resources 





by School


by Subject


by Book



Literature Study Guides


Infographics










Get Instant
                        Tutoring Help 





Ask a Tutor a Question








Use
                        Flashcards 





View Flashcards


Create Flashcards








Earn by
                        Contributing 





                                                            Earn Free AccessLearn More >


Upload Documents


Write Course Advice


Refer Your Friends


                                                            Earn MoneyLearn More >


Upload Documents


Create Q&A Pairs


Become a Tutor


Apply for Scholarship






Are you an educator?
Log in
Sign up 








Home


Schools


Paris Tech





Paris Tech
* We aren't endorsed by this school




Institut des sciences et technologies de Paris (Paris Tech) **
School Info 
Institut des sciences et technologies de Paris (Paris Tech) has 19 departments in Course Hero with 543 documents.




France


http://www.paristech.fr






* We aren't endorsed by this school




 





Find your department








All Departments (19)
'{[deptFilter.toUpperCase()]}' Departments ({[filteredDepartments.length]})


All
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
0-9








BBA

2 Documents 


BUSINESS

32 Documents 


CHIMI

3 Documents 


COMM

20 Documents 


COMPUTERS

14 Documents 


ECO

57 Documents 


ECON 

28 Documents 


FIN

12 Documents 


GEO

2 Documents 


GLT

188 Documents 


JAPANESE

50 Documents 


JHK

1 Document 


MANAGEMENT

1 Document 


MATH

11 Documents 


MBA

26 Documents 


MI

1 Document 


NETWORK

24 Documents 


PHYS

69 Documents 


SIP

2 Documents 





							{[ dept.deptAcro ]}
						

							{[ dept.deptAcro ]}
						


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog


{[ dept.numDocs | number:0 ]} Document{[dept.numDocs>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numQa | number:0 ]} Q&A{[dept.numQa>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numFlashcardSets | number:0 ]} Flashcard{[dept.numFlashcardSets>1?'s':'']}
{[ dept.numCourseAdvice | number:0 ]} Advice



{[ filteredDepartmentsMessage ]}






Paris Tech Documents (543)
Master your classes with homework help, exam study guides, past papers, and more for Paris Tech.

 All 
 Assessments 
 Assignments 
 Essays 
 Homework Help 
 Lab Reports 
 Lecture Slides 
 Lesson Plans 
 Notes 
 Reading Lists 
 Rubrics 
 Syllabi 
 Test Prep 


 
Most Recent Documents for Paris Tech
View all 






7 pages





                   Assignment.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    The notion that employee job satisfaction should be a top priority for managers has been one of
much debate. Although managers have many roles in organizations, their most important purpose is
to manage their organizations (employees) in a way that can ma
            

Register Now



Assignment.docx







4 pages





                   Perfiles.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        



Register Now



Perfiles.docx







6 pages





                   Intro.Modelo_Cont.Agua.R.Guayas.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    ESCUELA SUPERIOR POLITCNICA DEL LITORAL
FACULTAD DE INGENIERA MARTIMA, CIENCIAS BIOLGICAS, OCENICAS Y
RECURSOS NATURALES
RESUMEN EJECUTIVO
PRIMER PROYECTO
PRIMER PARCIAL
AUTOR:
KIMBERLY GABRIELLE REGALADO SNCHEZ
NELLY MELISSA NIETO SISALIMA
FREDDY DARWIN 
            

Register Now



Intro.Modelo_Cont.Agua.R.Guayas.docx







1 pages





                   Conclusiones.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Conclusiones:
En el primer da de mediciones con las veletas, la corriente offshore se diriga para el noreste,
debido a que se encontraba en la etapa flujo, es decir, subiendo la marea.
No se pudieron obtener muchas conclusiones de la primera siembra del p
            

Register Now



Conclusiones.docx







8 pages





                   8750.doc
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    170
B I B LI OG RAFA
ALLAUCA, S. 1990. Presencia de la Corriente Costanera Ecuatoriana, Acta
Oceanogrfica del Pacfico, INOCAR, Vol. 6, No. 1, pp. 10-17.
ASKREN, D. & A. BADAN, 1978. Conceptos de Oceanografa Fsica, Oregon State
University, pp. 6-7.
AYOUB, 
            

Register Now



8750.doc







3 pages





                   TESIS UPS-CT003653.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    UNIVERSIDAD POLITCNICA
SALESIANA SEDE CUENCA
CARRERA DE INGENIERA INDUSTRIAL
Tesis previa a la obtencin del ttulo de:
Ingeniero Industrial
TEMA:
DISEO DEL PROYECTO PARA LA IMPLEMENTACIN DE UNA EMPRESA
ELABORADORA DE MIEL DE ABEJAS MEDIANTE PROCESOS
INDUST
            

Register Now



TESIS UPS-CT003653.docx







3 pages





                   1500323288_254__7B.%252BCASO%252BENVASES%252BPLASTICOS%252BFLEXIBLES.doc
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Proyectos I 4678106
7B. La Determinacin del Tamao: CASO ENVASES PLSTICOS FLEXIBLES
Una empresa fabricante de envases flexibles debe evaluar los efectos econmicos de la
estrategia de crecimiento que el directorio de la compaa acord implementar en su
ltima 
            

Register Now



1500323288_254__7B.%252BCASO%252BENVASES%252BPLASTICOS%252BFLEXIBLES.doc







4 pages





                   2005-GEOG110-lab6.doc
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    GEOG 110 Lab #6 Modeling Surface Water Contamination
Due Date:
11:59pm, Friday, December 9, 2005
Objectives:
Familiarize yourself with the dynamic dissolved oxygen model described
in Chapter 5 of the course text, construct a model that makes use of the
ma
            

Register Now



2005-GEOG110-lab6.doc







3 pages





                   Vientos y Velocidad de corriente.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Estacin 1
Grfico 2. Estacin 1, primer da de mediciones.
Grfico 1. Estacin 1, segundo da de mediciones.
La velocidad de la corriente litoral en la
estacin 1 se muestra en las grficas 1 y 2. Se puede observar que durante el primer da de
mediciones la veloci
            

Register Now



Vientos y Velocidad de corriente.docx







4 pages





                   Microscopía.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    ESCUELA SUPERIOR POLITECNICA DEL LITORAL
FIMCM
BIOLOGIA PARA INGENIEROS
PRACTICA DE LABORATORIO
EL MICROSCOPIO COMPUESTO
PROFESOR: _
ALUMNO: _
PARALELO: _
FECHA: _
OBJETIVO
 Adquirir conocimiento y prctica en el uso del microscopio.
 Observar epidermis de
            

Register Now



Microscopía.docx







3 pages





                   Análisis-de-Refracción.SANPABLO (1).docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    REFRACCIN PARA SAN PABLO
Como es el caso de la playa San Pablo, para la respectiva realizacin del anlisis de la refraccin
fue necesario determinar cierta informacin bsica registrada en tablas que van a permitir
conocer a mayor detalla algunas caracterstic
            

Register Now



Análisis-de-Refracción.SANPABLO (1).docx







1 pages





                   Modelaje_Lopez.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    9 de julio de 2017
Alumno: Freddy Lpez
Grupo B
Curso: Modelaje Ambiental
Taller de incertidumbre de modelos
El tema del documento de anlisis es Transporte e Hidrodinmica de Sedimentos
Cohesivos en el estuario Ijzer, Blgica. El modelo, o juego en conjunto 
            

Register Now



Modelaje_Lopez.docx







7 pages





                   Resultados y analisis.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Resultados y anlisis
Coeficientes
Se calcularon primero los coeficientes de re-oxigenacin y desoxigenacin, K1 y K2, para ello se
us los datos de oxgeno disuelto y demanda biolgica de oxigeno:
Tabla: DBO y OD en del Rio Daule en la locacin Daule
Dia
En la 
            

Register Now



Resultados y analisis.docx







8 pages





                   Mercado meta y segmentación.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Mercado Objetivo
Para determinar a nuestro pblico objetivo, no solo se consider el gusto intrnseco que las personas
puede tener as el producto, tambin se lo determino de acuerdo con los datos censales que
proporciona el INEC (Censo 2010) y as, mediante un
            

Register Now



Mercado meta y segmentación.docx







8 pages





                   mercado_objetivo_tamanio_precio_d_venta.docx
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    Mercado Objetivo
Para determinar a nuestro pblico objetivo, no solo se consider el gusto intrnseco que las personas
puede tener as el producto, tambin se lo determino de acuerdo con los datos censales que
proporciona el INEC (Censo 2010) y as, mediante un
            

Register Now



mercado_objetivo_tamanio_precio_d_venta.docx







1 pages





                   factores%2Bde%2Bactivaci%25C3%25B3n%2Bdel%2BADN
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Tech
            

                                    GLT 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    1. Xq secuencia esta formada la reproduccin autnoma?
Esta formada por 2 secuencias GAGGC
2. Que induce la apertura de los orgenes de la reproduccin?
El nivel crecientes del factor promotor de fase S (FPS) de la fase S
3. Que sucede con la separacin de los
            

Register Now



factores%2Bde%2Bactivaci%25C3%25B3n%2Bdel%2BADN







8 pages





                   ECC1100 HW
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    Lecture 1 HW
1. Textbook, chapter 1, Problem no 3 on page 43.
2. Using the circular flow of income, explain why expenditure = income= production.
3. Define the four expenditure components of GDP. Clearly explain how they relate to the four
sectors.
4. Wha
            

Register Now



ECC1100 HW







3 pages





                   ECC1100 HW Print
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    Lecture 1 HW
1. Textbook, chapter 1, Problem no 3 on page 43.
2. Using the circular flow of income, explain why expenditure = income= production.
3. Define the four expenditure components of GDP. Clearly explain how they relate to the four
sectors.
4. Wha
            

Register Now



ECC1100 HW Print







1 pages





                   W2 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 2 Tutorial
1. Textbook, chapter 1, Problem no 3 on page 43.
2. Using the circular flow of income, explain why expenditure = income= production.
3. Define the four expenditure components of GDP. Clearly explain how they relate to
the f
            

Register Now



W2 tute







1 pages





                   W8 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 8 Tutorial
This week you and your tutor have an opportunity to review/discuss and extend any
topics we have covered so far.
Here are the topics and suggestions. You should note any questions/discussions you
might have.
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.

            

Register Now



W8 tute







1 pages





                   W3 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 3 Tutorial
NOTE: TEST 1 in this tutorial! All the best!
1. Textbook, chapter 1, Problem no 9 on page 43.
2. In your view which is the most important cost of inflation?
3. Define natural rate of employment.
4. Consider the following ne
            

Register Now



W3 tute







1 pages





                   W10 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 10 Tutorial
1. Chapter 10, review question 2 (page 308).
2. Chapter 10, Problem 2 (page 308)
3. Chapter 10, Problem 5 (page 308).
4. Why has inflation targeting been so effective in achieving low inflation?
5. Why is an aggregate supp
            

Register Now



W10 tute







1 pages





                   W7 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 7 Tutorial
1. Chapter 8, review question 2 (page 247).
2. Does the Reserve Bank control the nominal interest rate? The real interest rate?
3. Chapter 8, review question 3 (page 247).
4. Chapter 8, review question 7 (page 247).
5. Chap
            

Register Now



W7 tute







1 pages





                   W11 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 11 Tutorial
1. Why can underdeveloped countries often achieve higher growth rates than
developed countries?
2. In a developed country such as Australia, what will be the major determinant of
the growth in future living standards?
3. E
            

Register Now



W11 tute







1 pages





                   W4 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 4 Tutorial
1. Define planned aggregate expenditure and list its components. Why does planned
spending change when output changes?
2. Explain how planned spending and actual spending can differ. Illustrate with an
example.
3. Sketch th
            

Register Now



W4 tute







1 pages





                   W5 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 5 Tutorial
1. Textbook, Chapter 6, page 197. Problem 1.
2. Discuss three reasons why the use of fiscal policy to stabilise the economy is more
complicated than suggested by the basic Keynesian model.
3. What problems are caused by aut
            

Register Now



W5 tute







1 pages





                   W6 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 6 Tutorial
NOTE: TEST 2 in this tutorial! All the best!
1. What is money? Why do people hold money even though it pays a lower return
than other financial assets?
2. Suppose the public switches from doing most of its shopping with cur
            

Register Now



W6 tute







1 pages





                   W12 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 12 Tutorial
1. What types of transactions are recorded in the current account of the balance of
payments?
2. What types of transactions are recorded in the capital account of the balance of
payments?
3. What is the relationship betwee
            

Register Now



W12 tute







1 pages





                   W9 tute
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    Principles of Macro
            

                                    ECON  1100
                                        -
                                        Spring 2017
                        

                    ECC1100 S1 2017
Week 9 Tutorial
1. Chapter 9, review question 1 (page 282).
2. Chapter 9, review question 2 (page 282).
3. Chapter 9, review question 4 (page 283).
4. Chapter 9, review question 5 (page 283).
1

            

Register Now



W9 tute







10 pages





                   INFORME VELOCIDAD INSTANTANEA (29-11-10)
                


                        Paris Tech
            

                    strategic management
            

                                    MBA 123
                                        -
                                        Spring 2010
                        

                    TTULO DE LA PRCTICA: VELOCIDAD INSTANTNEA Y
ACELERACIN
NOMBRE DEL ESTUDIANTE: CARLOS SALAZAR ENDARA
PARALELO: #61
FECHA: 29-11-10
1
RESUMEN
El objetivo de la practica fue cronometrar con ayuda de un cronometro de una computadora,
intervalos de tiempo para
            

Register Now



INFORME VELOCIDAD INSTANTANEA (29-11-10)








Paris Tech Questions & Answers



Showing 1 to 0 of 0
View all 







Paris Tech Flashcards

 
Showing 1 to 0 of 0
View all 







Paris Tech Courses with Advice


Showing 1 to {[ numOfCoursesWithAdviceToShow ]} of {[ totalNumCoursesWithAdvice ]}
View all 

Sort by:


{[$select.selected.label]}











								{[ courseWithAdvice.deptAcro + " " + courseWithAdvice.courseNum ]}
								{[ courseWithAdvice.courseName ]}
							


Course Hero has verified this tag with the official school catalog




(from {[ courseWithAdvice.numCourseAdvice ]} students)





Be the first to share words of wisdom!
You'll get $10 in tutor credits for sharing advice on 3 courses.
Give Advice





Paris Tech Top Courses




											GLT 12 - tech										
 (169 Documents)





											JAPANESE 101 - Japanese										
 (50 Documents)





											ECO 010023 - MACRO I										
 (48 Documents)





											PHYS 101 - Physics										
 (41 Documents)





											BUSINESS 101 - finance										
 (32 Documents)





											MBA 123 - strategic management										
 (26 Documents)





											NETWORK 563 - Session-per										
 (23 Documents)





											COMM 200										
 (20 Documents)





											GLT 123 - Tech										
 (19 Documents)





											PHYS 510 - phys510										
 (17 Documents)







Browse Schools















            Tweet
        








Ask a homework question
 - tutors are online











 

























		As new Valeant CFO, merger expert Robert Rosiello ready to maintain M&A momentum | Financial Post		

































































 
 



 















































Sign In/Register
Subscribe


















Search FinancialPost.com ...




























As new Valeant CFO, merger expert Robert Rosiello ready to maintain M&A momentum
Valeant’s new Chief Financial Officer made his mark as an expert in healthcare mergers and acquisitions, and this is exactly what he wants to continue doing at Canada’s largest publicly-traded drug company 




Canadian Press 










Damon van der Linde			
 

June 11, 20154:49 PM EDTLast UpdatedJune 11, 20154:49 PM EDT 
Filed under Investing   

Comment


Facebook


Twitter


Email


More







Share this storyAs new Valeant CFO, merger expert Robert Rosiello ready to maintain M&A momentumTumblrPinterestGoogle PlusLinkedInReddit 








MONTREAL – Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s new Chief Financial Officer made his mark as an expert in healthcare mergers and acquisitions, and this is exactly what he wants to continue doing at Canada’s largest publicly-traded drug company.
“This is an organization that totally sweats the details and knows how to not only employ capital, but make it perform,” said Robert Rosiello, who was appointed CFO by the Laval, Que.-based company on Thursday.
Rosiello spent 30 years at McKinsey & Co., where he previously worked alongside Valeant’s CEO, Michael Pearson.
For the past decade, Rosiello was senior partner in charge of the global merger practice and led global M&A integrations for a variety of healthcare companies.
“Most of the clients I’ve served are focused on where to compete. [Valeant] adds the additional dimension of how to compete and I think that allows it to move into other arenas,” said Rosiello in an interview
He’s joining Valeant soon after the company won a bidding war for U.S.-based Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd., and is also reported to be in talks to acquire Egypt’s Amoun Pharmaceutical Co, which produces both human and veterinary medicines.
“If you ask me what is the secret sauce of this company, I think the market’s reaction to the Salix announcement several weeks ago would suggest this is a place that is in its sweet spot in the identification of assets, the execution and the integration,” said Rosiello.
Valeant’s stock climbed 14 per cent since the Salix deal was announced, and at least one analyst says Rosiello seems like the right person for the job of keeping the company growing.

Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc. is now worth more than Toronto-Dominion, Canada’s second largest stock
Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc wooing Egyptian drugmaker, wants to expand into veterinary medicine

“We believe Mr. Rosiello’s expertise in M&A and business unit financial performance improvement, particularly in healthcare, technology, and consumer care, should be valuable given Valeant’s M&A-driven strategy and suggests no near-term change in the strategic direction of the company,” wrote Alex Arfaei, a pharmaceuticals industry analyst at BMO Nesbitt Burns.
Valeant has made more than 30 acquisitions in the past five years. However, in June 2014 Botox-maker Allergan Inc. rejected a US$53-billion takeover offer saying Valeant undervalued the company and was risky for shareholders.
Rosiello disagrees with critics who say Valeant is focused too much on acquisitions and not enough on organic growth.
“I would say they don’t understand what the company does. I think that is the external world’s impression of what they do. Where this team spends its time is in a level of detail that I have never witnessed in any client, be it another health care client or any other industry,” said Rosiello.
Valeant posted 15 per cent organic growth in the first quarter of 2015, and Pearson has said he is certain it will continue in the double-digits, at least until the end of 2016.
Rosiello will replace CFO Howard Schiller effective July 1. In April, Schiller announced his intention to quit, though he will remain on Valeant’s board and serve as a consultant.
Rosiello’s appointment came on the same day ValueAct Capital Management, L.P. announced that it has sold 4.2 million Valeant shares.
ValueAct CEO Jeffrey W. Ubben — who also sits on the Valeant board — said that the pharmaceutical company’s performance caused its investment to grow above 20 per cent of the fund’s assets.
Ubben says this prompted ValueAct to reduce its position in Valeant for the third time in nine years in order to rebalance its portfolio.
“Our job is to continue to drive the performance of this company so that they’ll have to do it again,” said Pearson in an interview.
ValueAct held 19.4 million Valeant shares as of March 31, 2015, representing a 5.7 per cent stake worth $4.4 billion today.
After the sale, the fund will still own a 4.5 per cent stake worth $3.5 billion, and remain the fourth-largest shareholder.







0


Comments
Share your thoughts













    News Videos 
 


Business Trends






 




This content was provided by Market One for commercial purposes.

x




Advertisement by  Market One 




Millennials’ use of technology is driving lithium demand 






							Millennial Lithium is looking to power tomorrow’s generation						





The strategic approach of ABcann’s growth technique 






							Aaron Keay, CEO of ABcann Global Corporation, speaks with Natasha Frakes about why the company waited two years from getting their license before going public.						





Your audience, your rewards 






							Peeks Social Ltd. (TSXV: PEEK) is one of this year’s recipients of the TSX Venture 50™						





K92 bucks market trend and closes oversubscribed financing for $16.6 million 






							The K92 team has established itself as a contrarian group, of sorts, from inception.						




    











Investing



 












Amazon’s earnings miss is being felt around the world this morning 










Worried about Amazon.com? Don't be 











Cost-cutting miners shine despite range-bound gold prices 










You're not ordering enough: Amazon profit plunges 77 per cent 











Was the Fed statement hawkish or dovish? 










Libor: Why banks are set to abandon 'the world's most important number' 


  
 
















HBC's Kaufhof retailer sees supplier credit insurance slashed 










What oil slump?: Calfrac rehires staff on surging revenue, robust fracking activity 











Mortgage rule changes may help first-time home buyers, but they could hurt alternative lenders 










Get ready for the ‘Day From Hell’ as $3 trillion of companies post earnings 











Should index providers require listed companies to have voting rights? 










It’s a bird, it’s a plane — Nope, it’s the incredible surging loonie 


 
 



 
 





Top Stories






 






WatchHow BRP caught a big wave, while Bombardier was left treading water 

						BRP's stock is at all-time highs, it has a new dividend and an ambitious growth plan, meanwhile the former parent limps along					

 






Canada's economic growth just blew past expectations — and you know what that means 

						The data bolsters expectations for another interest rate hike from the Bank of Canada this year					

 






Amazon’s earnings miss is being felt around the world this morning 

						By Abhinav Ramnarayan LONDON — An earnings miss by Amazon that hit U.S. technology stocks overnight rippled through into other markets on Friday, with Asian stocks retreating from recent highs ...					

 






Check your flight status: Pearson airport ground workers are out on strike 

						The GTAA warns that the ‘labour disruption may affect some flights’					

  
 
 
 




This Week in Flyers









		Find Financial Post on Facebook	











 














Sign Up / Sign In


With your existing account from:
			{* loginWidget *} 



or with your  account:
				{* #signInForm *}
					{* signInEmailAddress *}
					{* currentPassword *}
					
Forgot your password?


 Sign In
Create Account

				{* /signInForm *}
			



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Sign in to your account


Welcome back, {* welcomeName *}!
			{* loginWidget *}
			Not {* welcomeName *}? Switch Account



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Sign in to your account

Welcome Back, {* welcomeName *}!

			{* #signInForm *}
				{* signInEmailAddress *}
				{* currentPassword *}
				
 Sign In

			{* /signInForm *}
			Not {* welcomeName *}? Switch Account



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Account Deactivated


Your account has been deactivated.



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ







Account Reactivation Failed

Sorry, we could not verify that email address.


 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ







Account Activated

Your account has been reactivated.
			
Sign in



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Email Verification Required

You must verify your email address before signing in. Check your email for your verification email, or enter your email address in the form below to resend the email.

		{* #resendVerificationForm *}
			{* signInEmailAddress *}
			


		{* /resendVerificationForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ









Almost Done!

Please confirm your details below.
			{* #socialRegistrationForm *}
				
				{* firstName *}
				{* lastName *}
				{* emailAddress *}
				{* displayName *}
                
Postmedia wants to improve your reading experience as well as share the best deals and promotions from our advertisers with you. The information below will be used to optimize the content and make ads across the network more relevant to you. You can always change the information you share with us by editing your profile.
Birthdate{* birthdate *}
Gender{* gender *}


Attention Print Newspaper SubscribersFor verification of Print Subscriber offers (e.g. epaper, Digital Access, Subscriber Rewards), please input your Print Newspaper subscription phone number and postal code.
					{* phone *}
					{* addressPostalCode *}
				

By clicking "Create Account", I hearby grant permission to Postmedia to use my account information to create my account.
I also accept and agree to be bound by Postmedia's Terms and Conditions with respect to my use of the Site and I have read and understand Postmedia's Privacy Statement. I consent to the collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure of my information in accordance with the Postmedia's Privacy Policy.

					{* backButton *}
					

			{* /socialRegistrationForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Almost Done!

Please confirm your details below.  Already have an account? Sign In.
		{* #registrationForm *}		
			
			{* firstName *}
			{* lastName *}
			{* emailAddress *}
			{* displayName *}
			{* newPassword *}
			{* newPasswordConfirm *}
            
Postmedia wants to improve your reading experience as well as share the best deals and promotions from our advertisers with you. The information below will be used to optimize the content and make ads across the network more relevant to you. You can always change the information you share with us by editing your profile.
Birthdate{* birthdate *}
Gender{* gender *}


Attention Print Newspaper SubscribersFor verification of Print Subscriber offers (e.g. epaper, Digital Access, Subscriber Rewards), please input your Print Newspaper subscription phone number and postal code.
				{* phone *}
				{* addressPostalCode *}
			

By clicking "Create Account", I hearby grant permission to Postmedia to use my account information to create my account.
I also accept and agree to be bound by Postmedia's Terms and Conditions with respect to my use of the Site and I have read and understand Postmedia's Privacy Statement. I consent to the collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure of my information in accordance with the Postmedia's Privacy Policy.

				{* backButton *}
				

		{* /registrationForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Verfiy your email

We have sent you a confirmation email to {* emailAddressData *}. Please check your inbox and follow the instructions to confirm your email address.

Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ









Create a new password

Follow these simple steps to create a new password:

 			1. Enter your email address below
 			2. Wait for the instructions to arrive in your inbox
 			3. Follow the instructions to update your password
 		
		{* #forgotPasswordForm *}
			{* signInEmailAddress *}
			
					{* backButton *}
					

		{* /forgotPasswordForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Create a new password

We've sent an email with instructions to create a new password. Your existing password has not been changed.

Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ






    {* mergeAccounts {"custom": true} *}
	


Merge Your Accounts


					{| rendered_current_photo |}
				

					{| current_displayName |}
					{| current_emailAddress |}
				


{| foundExistingAccountText |} {| current_emailAddress |}.
				

{| moreInfoHoverText |}
						{| existing_displayName |} - {| existing_provider |} : {| existing_siteName |} {| existing_createdDate |}
					
					{| moreInfoText |}
				






							{| existing_displayName |}
{| existing_provider_emailAddress |}

Created {| existing_createdDate |} at {| existing_siteName |}







							{| connectLegacyRadioText |}
					




							{| createRadioText |} {| current_provider |}
					



Validating



				{| connect_button |}
				{| create_button |}
			



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Sign in to complete account merge



			{* #signInForm *}
				{* signInEmailAddress *}
				{* currentPassword *}
				
					{* backButton *}
					 Sign In

			 {* /signInForm *}
		


 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ










Resend Verification Email

Sorry, we could not verify your email address. Please enter your email below, and we'll resend the instructions for email verification.
		{* #resendVerificationForm *}
			{* signInEmailAddress *}
			


		 {* /resendVerificationForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Verification Email Sent


Check your email for a link to verify your email address.

Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Email Verified

Thank you for verifiying your email address.
		
Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ










Change Password



			{* #changePasswordFormNoAuth *}
				{* newPassword *}
				{* newPasswordConfirm *}
				


			{* /changePasswordFormNoAuth *}
		


 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Password Changed

Your password has been successfully updated.

Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Create New Password

We didn't recognize that password reset code. Please enter your email below, and we'll send you a new code to reset your password.
		{* #resetPasswordForm *}
			{* signInEmailAddress *}
			


		{* /resetPasswordForm *}
	

 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ








Create New Password

We've sent you an email with instructions to create a new password. Your existing password has not been changed.

Close



 is a division of Postmedia Inc.

Privacy
FAQ












































































































































































